Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB91.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The definitions of "firefighter," "municipality," "police officer" and "volunteer fire company" in section 2 of the act of December 16, 1998 (P.L.980, No.129), known as the Police Officer, Firefighter, Correction Employee and National Guard Member Child Beneficiary Education Act, are amended to read:Section 2. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this act shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the 12345678910111213141516171819202122 context clearly indicates otherwise:* * *"Firefighter." An individual employed in that capacity on a full-time basis [by a municipality] or a member of a volunteer fire company [of this Commonwealth]. The term includes members of a rescue squad or ambulance service [as defined in the act of June 24, 1976 (P.L.424, No.101), referred to as the Emergency and Law Enforcement Personnel Death Benefits Act.]. The term includes members of a rescue squad or ambulance service outside of this Commonwealth.* * *["Municipality." A county, city, borough, incorporated town or township, regardless of form of government.]* * *"Police officer." An individual employed on a full-time or part-time basis by the Commonwealth as a member of the Pennsylvania State Police Force or an individual employed on a full-time or part-time basis as a police officer [by a municipality of this Commonwealth]. The term includes a police officer employed outside of this Commonwealth.* * *"Volunteer fire company." A nonprofit chartered corporation, association or organization [located in this Commonwealth] which provides fire protection services [within this Commonwealth].Section 2. Section 3(a) of the act is amended to read:Section 3. Postsecondary Educational Gratuity Program.(a) Establishment.--(1) There is hereby established the Postsecondary Educational Gratuity Program for children of police officers, firefighters, correction employees, sheriffs, deputy sheriffs 20250SB0091PN0046 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 and National Guard members and certain other individuals who are on Federal or State active military duty who, except as provided under paragraph (2), are residents of this Commonwealth who are killed while acting in the performance of their duties.(2) A police officer, firefighter, sheriff or deputy sheriff who is employed in that capacity on a full-time basis outside this Commonwealth or as a member of a volunteer fire company located outside of this Commonwealth must have been a full-time resident of this Commonwealth for a continuous period of at least three years at the time of their death.* * *Section 3. Section 8 of the act is repealed:[Section 8. Retroactivity.This act shall be retroactive to January 1, 1976, and the benefit provided shall be available to qualified children of police officers, firefighters, correction employees and National Guard members of this Commonwealth killed in the performance of their duties since that date. No community college, State-owned or State-related institution shall reimburse qualified children for tuition and fees or room and board charges paid between January 1, 1976, and the effective date of this act.]Section 4. The amendment of the definitions of "firefighter," "municipality," "police officer" and "volunteer fire company" in section 2 and section 3(a) of the act shall apply retroactively to January 1, 2004, and the benefit provided shall be available to qualified children of police officers, firefighters, rescue squad or ambulance service members, sheriffs and deputy sheriffs killed in the performance of their duties since that date. A community college, State-owned or 20250SB0091PN0046 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 State-related institution may not reimburse qualified children for tuition and fees or room and board charges paid between January 1, 2004, and the effective date of this section.Section 5. The Legislative Reference Bureau shall, within 30 days of the effective date of this section, remove the findings and declarations from the act.Section 6. This act shall take effect immediately.20250SB0091PN0046 - 4 - 1234567